en: Compatible cosmetic tools: Beauty tool containers; Eyebrow trimmers; Eyelash curlers; Makeup brushes; Makeup mixing palettes; Powder puffs; Silicone applicators; Spatula; Sponges; Tweezers; Other
zh-TW: 相容美妝工具: 美容工具容器; 修眉器; 睫毛夾; 美妝刷具; 化妝混合調色盤; 粉撲; 矽膠塗抹器; 抹刀; 海綿; 美容鑷子; 其他
fr: Outils cosmétiques compatibles: Conteneurs d'outils de beauté; Coupe-sourcils; Recourbe-cils; Pinceaux de maquillage; Palettes de mélange de maquillage; Poudriers; Applicateurs en silicone; Spatule; Éponges; Pinces à épiler; Autre
lt-LT: Suderinami kosmetikos įrankiai: Kosmetinės; Antakių kirpimo mašinėlės; Blakstienų rietikliai; Makiažo šepetėliai; Makiažo maišymo paletės; Pudros kempinėlės; Silikoniniai aplikatoriai; Mentelės; Kempinės; Pincetai; Kita
ja: 使用可能なメイク道具: 美容器具容器; 眉毛トリマー; ビューラー; メイクブラシ; メイクアップミキシングパレット; パウダーパフ; シリコンアプリケーター; スパチュラ; スポンジ; ピンセット; その他
bg-BG: Съвместими козметични инструменти: Контейнери за козметични инструменти; Тримери за вежди; Извивачки за мигли; Четки за грим; Палитри за смесване на грим; Пуфове за пудра; Силиконови апликатори; Шпатула; Гъбички; Пинсети; Други
tr: Uyumlu kozmetik araçlar: Güzellik aracı kapları; Kaş düzelticiler; Kirpik kıvırıcılar; Makyaj fırçaları; Makyaj karıştırma paletleri; Toz ponponları; Silikon aplikatörler; Spatula; Süngerler; Cımbızlar; Diğer
sk-SK: Kompatibilné kozmetické nástroje: Nádoby na kozmetické pomôcky; Zastrihávač obočia; Kliešte na mihalnice; Štetce na make-up; Palety na miešanie make-upu; Púdrové vankúšiky; Silikónové aplikátory; Špachtľa; Špongie; Pinzeta; Iné
nl: Compatibele cosmetische hulpmiddelen: Oprberghouders voor schoonheidsgereedschap; Wenkbrauwtrimmers; Oogwimperkrullers; Make-upkwasten; Make-upmengpaletten; Poederdonsjes; Siliconen applicators; Spatel; Sponzen; Pincetten; Andere
ro-RO: Instrumente cosmetice compatibile: Cutii de depozitare pentru instrumente de cosmetică; Dispozitive de tuns sprâncene; Ondulatoare de gene; Pensule de machiaj; Palete pentru mixare machiaj; Pufuri pentru pudră; Aplicatoare din silicon; Spatulă; Bureți; Pensetă; Altele
nb: Kompatible kosmetiske verktøy: Skjønnhetsverktøybeholdere; Øyenbrynstrimmere; Øyevippekrøllere; Sminkebørster; Sminkeblandingspaletter; Pudderpuffer; Silikonapplikatorer; Stekespade; Svamper; Pinsetter; Annet
sv: Kompatibla kosmetikverktyg: Skönhet verktyg behållare; Ögonbrynstrimmers; Ögonfransböjare; Sminkborstar; Sminkblandningspaletter; Puderpuffar; Silikonapplikatorer; Spatel; Svampar; Pincetter; Övrigt
vi: Dụng cụ thẩm mỹ tương thích: Hộp đựng dụng cụ làm đẹp; Dụng cụ tỉa lông mày; Bấm lông mi; Cọ trang điểm; Bảng trộn trang điểm; Bông phấn; Dụng cụ bôi bằng silicon; Thìa vét bột; Mút trang điểm; Nhíp; Khác
cs: Vhodné kosmetické pomůcky: Nádoby na kosmetické pomůcky; Zastřihovače obočí; Natáčky na řasy; Štětce na makeup; Palety na míchání make-upu; Pudrové labutěnky; Silikonové aplikátory; Špachtle; Houby; Pinzety; Jiné
it: Utensili cosmetici compatibili: Contenitori per strumenti di bellezza; Trimmer per sopracciglia; Piegaciglia; Pennelli per il trucco; Tavolozze per miscelare il trucco; Piumini da cipria; Applicatori in silicone; Spatola; Spugne; Pinzette; Altro
de: Kompatible Kosmetikwerkzeuge: Behälter für Beautytools; Augenbrauenschneider; Wimpernformer; Make-up-Pinsel; Mischpaletten für Make-up; Puderquasten; Silikonapplikatoren; Spachtel; Schwämme; Pinzette; Sonstiges
hu: Kompatibilis kozmetikai eszközök: Tárolók szépségápoló eszközökhöz; Szemöldöktrimmelők; Szempilla-göndörítők; Sminkecsetek; Sminkkeverő paletták; Púderpamacsok; Szilikon applikátorok; Spatula; Szivacsok; Csipeszek; Egyéb
es: Herramientas cosméticas compatibles: Contenedores de herramientas de belleza; Recortadores de cejas; Rizadores de pestañas; Brochas para maquillaje; Paletas para mezclar maquillaje; Borlas de polvo; Aplicadores de silicona; Espátula; Esponjas; Pinzas; Otros
pl: Kompatybilne narzędzia kosmetyczne: Pojemniki na przybory kosmetyczne; Trymery do brwi; Zalotki; Pędzle do makijażu; Palety do mieszania makijażu; Puszki do pudru; Aplikatory silikonowe; Szpatułka; Gąbki; Pęseta; Inne
da: Kompatible kosmetiske værktøjer: Skønhedsværktøjsbeholdere; Øjenbrynstrimmere; Øjenvippecurlere; Makeupbørster; Makeupblandepaletter; Pudderbørster; Silikoneapplikatorer; Spatel; Svampe; Pincetter; Andet
zh-CN: 适用美妆工具: 美容用具容器; 修眉刀; 睫毛夹; 化妆刷; 化妆混合调色板; 粉扑; 硅胶粉扑; 抹刀; 海绵; 美容镊子; 其他
ru: Совместимые косметические инструменты: Контейнеры для косметических средств; Триммеры для бровей; Щипцы для завивки ресниц; Кисти для макияжа; Палетки для макияжа; Пуховки для пудры; Силиконовые аппликаторы; Шпатель; Спонжи; Пинцеты; Другое
sl-SI: Združljiva kozmetična orodja: Posode za lepotilne pripomočke; Trimerji za obrvi; Pripomočki za vihanje trepalnic; Čopiči za ličenje; Palete za mešanje ličil; Blazinice za nanašanje pudra; Silikonski aplikatorji; Spatula; Gobice; Pincete; Drugo
hr-HR: Kompatibilni kozmetički pribor: Spremnici za kozmetičke alate; Trimeri za obrve; Uvijači za trepavice; Kistovi za šminkanje; Palete za miješanje šminke; Spužvice za puder; Silikonski aplikatori; Lopatica; Spužvice; Pinceta; Ostalo
el: Συμβατά εργαλεία καλλυντικών: Δοχεία εργαλείων ομορφιάς; Μηχανές κουρέματος φρυδιών; Ψαλίδια βλεφαρίδων; Πινέλα μακιγιάζ; Παλέτες ανάμειξης μακιγιάζ; Πομπόν πουδραρίσματος; Βουρτσάκια σιλικόνης; Σπάτουλα; Σφουγγάρια; Τσιμπιδάκια φρυδιών; Άλλο
ko: 호환 가능한 화장 도구: 미용 도구함; 눈썹 정리칼; 속눈썹 뷰러; 메이크업 브러시; 메이크업 믹싱 팔레트; 파우더 퍼프; 실리콘 애플리케이터; 스파츌라; 스펀지; 족집게; 기타
fi: Yhteensopivat kosmeettiset välineet: Kosmetiikkavälineiden säiliöt; Kulmakarvatrimmerit; Ripsientaivuttimet; Meikkisiveltimet; Meikkisekoituspaletit; Puuterihuiskut; Silikoniset applikaattorit; Spatula; Sienet; Pinsetit; Muu
th: อุปกรณ์แต่งหน้าที่เข้ากันได้: ที่ใส่เครื่องมือเสริมความงาม; ที่กันคิ้ว; ที่ดัดขนตา; แปรงแต่งหน้า; ถาดผสมเครื่องสำอาง; พัฟแป้ง; ซิลิโคนแต่งหน้า; ไม้พาย; ฟองน้ำ; แหนบ; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Ferramentas cosméticas compatíveis: Caixas para produtos de beleza; Aparadores de sobrancelha; Curvex; Pincéis de maquiagem; Paletas de mistura de maquiagem; Esponja de pó; Aplicadores de silicone; Espátula; Esponjas; Pinças; Outro
pt-PT: Ferramentas cosméticas compatíveis: Recipientes para instrumentos de beleza; Aparadores para sobrancelhas; Modeladores de pestanas; Escovas de maquilhagem; Paletas de mistura de maquilhagem; Esponjas para pó; Aplicadores de silicone; Espátula; Esponjas; Pinças; Outro